testing/myv-tests-adj.yaml
  
  Adjective - ашо: # Ordinary adjectives - full paradigm including MWN
     ашо+A: ашо
     ашо+A+Pred+Pl+Indef: ашот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Indef: ашо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Indef: ашонь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Indef: ашонь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: ашодо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Pl+Indef: ашодо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Indef: ашонень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Pl+Indef: ашонень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Com+Sg+Indef: ашонек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Com+Pl+Indef: ашонек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Indef: ашовтомо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Pl+Indef: ашовтомо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Indef: ашошка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Indef: ашошка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Indef: ашосо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Indef: ашосо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Indef: ашосто
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Indef: ашосто
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ill+Sg+Indef: ашос
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ill+Pl+Indef: ашос
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Indef: ашова
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Indef: ашова
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: ашокс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Pl+Indef: ашокс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Lat+Sg+Indef: ашов
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Lat+Pl+Indef: ашов
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+TempCx+Sg+Indef: ашоне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+TempCx+Pl+Indef: ашоне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Px1Sg: ашом
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px1Sg: [ашом, ашон]
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px1Sg: ашон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Px1Sg: ашодон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Pl+Px1Sg: ашодон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Sg: ашовтомон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Sg: ашовтомон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Sg: ашошкан
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Sg: ашошкан
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg: ашосон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg: ашосон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg: ашостон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg: ашостон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ill+Sg+Px1Sg: ашозон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ill+Pl+Px1Sg: ашозон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg: ашован
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg: ашован
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Px1Sg: ашоксон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Pl+Px1Sg: ашоксон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Px2Sg: ашот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Pl+Px2Sg: ашот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg: ашот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg: ашот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Px2Sg: ашодот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Pl+Px2Sg: ашодот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg: ашовтомот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg: ашовтомот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px2Sg: ашошкат
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px2Sg: ашошкат
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px2Sg: ашосот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px2Sg: ашосот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px2Sg: ашостот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px2Sg: ашостот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ill+Sg+Px2Sg: ашозот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ill+Pl+Px2Sg: ашозот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px2Sg: ашоват
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px2Sg: ашоват
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Px2Sg: ашоксот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Pl+Px2Sg: ашоксот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Px3Sg: ашозо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg: ашонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg: ашонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Px3Sg: ашодонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Pl+Px3Sg: ашодонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Px3Sg: ашонстэнь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Pl+Px3Sg: ашонстэнь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg: ашовтомонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg: ашовтомонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px3Sg: ашошканзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px3Sg: ашошканзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px3Sg: ашосонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px3Sg: ашосонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px3Sg: ашостонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px3Sg: ашостонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ill+Sg+Px3Sg: ашозонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ill+Pl+Px3Sg: ашозонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px3Sg: ашованзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px3Sg: ашованзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Px3Sg: ашоксонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Pl+Px3Sg: ашоксонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Px1Pl: ашонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Pl+Px1Pl: ашонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px1Pl: ашонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px1Pl: ашонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Px1Pl: ашодонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Pl+Px1Pl: ашодонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl: ашовтомонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl: ашовтомонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl: ашошканок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl: ашошканок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl: ашосонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl: ашосонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl: ашостонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl: ашостонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ill+Sg+Px1Pl: ашозонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ill+Pl+Px1Pl: ашозонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Pl: ашованок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Pl: ашованок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Px1Pl: ашоксонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Pl+Px1Pl: ашоксонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Px2Pl: ашонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Pl+Px2Pl: ашонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Pl: ашонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Pl: ашонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Px2Pl: ашодонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Pl+Px2Pl: ашодонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Pl: ашовтомонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Pl: ашовтомонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px2Pl: ашошканк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px2Pl: ашошканк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px2Pl: ашосонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px2Pl: ашосонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px2Pl: ашостонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px2Pl: ашостонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ill+Sg+Px2Pl: ашозонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ill+Pl+Px2Pl: ашозонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px2Pl: ашованк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px2Pl: ашованк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Px2Pl: ашоксонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Pl+Px2Pl: ашоксонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Px3Pl: ашост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Pl+Px3Pl: ашост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Pl: ашост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Pl: ашост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Px3Pl: ашодост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Pl+Px3Pl: ашодост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Pl: ашовтомост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Pl: ашовтомост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px3Pl: ашошкаст
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px3Pl: ашошкаст
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px3Pl: ашосост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px3Pl: ашосост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px3Pl: ашостост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px3Pl: ашостост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ill+Sg+Px3Pl: ашозост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ill+Pl+Px3Pl: ашозост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px3Pl: ашоваст
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px3Pl: ашоваст
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Px3Pl: ашоксост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Pl+Px3Pl: ашоксост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Pl+Indef: ашот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Pl+Px1Sg: ашон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Pl+Px3Sg: ашонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: ашось
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: ашонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: ашонтень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: ашодонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: ашосонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: ашостонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: ашованть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: ашовтомонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: ашошканть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: ашоксонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: ашотне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: ашотнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: ашотненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: ашотнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: ашотнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: ашотнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: ашотнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Prl: ашотнева
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: ашотнекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat: ашотнев
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe: ашотневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp: ашотнешка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com: ашотненек
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: ашоседе
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Pl+Indef: ашоседе
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: ашосекс
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Pl+Indef: ашосекс
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: ашосесь
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: ашосенть
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: ашосентень
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: ашоседенть
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: ашосесэнть
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: ашосестэнть
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: ашосеванть
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: ашосевтементь
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: ашосешканть
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: ашосексэнть
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: ашосетне
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: ашосетнень
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: ашосетненень
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: ашосетнеде
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: ашосетнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: ашосетнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: ашосетнес
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Prl: ашосетнева
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: ашосетнекс
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat: ашосетнев
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe: ашосетневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp: ашосетнешка
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com: ашосетненек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: ашонзодо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Pl+Indef: ашонзодо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: ашонзодо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Pl+Indef: ашонзодо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: ашонзокс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Pl+Indef: ашонзокс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: ашонзокс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Pl+Indef: ашонзокс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: ашонзось
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: ашонзось
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: ашонзонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: ашонзонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: ашонзонтень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: ашонзонтень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: ашонзодонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: ашонзодонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: ашонзосонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: ашонзосонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: ашонзостонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: ашонзостонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: ашонзованть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: ашонзованть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: ашонзовтомонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: ашонзовтомонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: ашонзошканть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: ашонзошканть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: ашонзоксонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: ашонзоксонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: ашонзотне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: ашонзотне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: ашонзотнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: ашонзотнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: ашонзотненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: ашонзотненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: ашонзотнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: ашонзотнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: ашонзотнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: ашонзотнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: ашонзотнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: ашонзотнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: ашонзотнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: ашонзотнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Prl: ашонзотнева
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Prl: ашонзотнева
